Hawaii statutes.
[PART
III. LAVA ZONES]

Revision Note

Part heading added pursuant to §23G-15.

[§431:10E-141] Lava zone defined. As
used in this article, "lava zone" means a volcanic hazard zone
identified by the United States Geological Survey on the island of Hawaii. [L
2015, c 32, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next